Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.460

Disputes regarding local regulations—Arbitration—Panel.

Disputes arising under this chapter regarding whether any city or town's telecommunications rules, regulations, or ordinances are equal to the rules adopted by the department shall be resolved by arbitration. The department shall appoint two members of the board to serve on the arbitration panel, and the city or town shall appoint two persons to serve on the arbitration panel. These four persons shall choose a fifth person to serve. If the four persons cannot agree on a fifth person, the presiding judge of the superior court of the county in which the city or town is located shall choose a fifth person. A decision of the arbitration panel may be appealed to the superior court of the county in which the city or town is located within thirty days after the date the panel issues its final decision.

[ 2000 c 238 s 210.]

NOTES:

Severability—2000 c 238: See note following RCW 19.28.301.